Maine, session 132, LD1833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. University of Maine System and University of Maine School of Law
to establish night school law program in Orono. By the beginning of the 2028-2029
academic year, the University of Maine System in collaboration with the University of
Maine School of Law shall establish at the University of Maine at Orono a juris doctor
program that allows a student enrolled in the program to fulfill the degree requirements for
a juris doctor primarily by attending classes at night through online course work with
periodic in-person instruction. By November 4, 2026, the University of Maine System
shall submit a report related to the establishment of the night school law program to the
Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs.